Maryland, session 2026, HB1442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1442*

HOUSE BILL 1442
Article – Corporations and Associations
5–601.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(f) “Member–regulated cooperative” means a cooperative:
(1) That provides retail electric service to its members on the Eastern
Shore of Maryland; and
(2) Whose board of directors has passed a binding resolution to operate as
a member–regulated cooperative.
Article – Public Utilities
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) (1) “Aggregator” means an entity or an individual that acts on behalf of a
customer to purchase electricity or gas.
(2) “Aggregator” does not include:
(i) an entity or individual that purchases electricity or gas only for
its own use or for the use of its subsidiaries or affiliates;
(ii) a municipal electric utility or a municipal gas utility serving only
in its distribution territory; or
(iii) a combination of governmental units that purchases electricity
or gas for use by the governmental units.
(f) “Community choice aggregator” means a county that serves as an electric
aggregator for the purpose of negotiating the purchase of electric generation services from
an electricity supplier licensed by the Commission or from an electric generating or storage
facility, or providing electricity from an electric generating facility owned by the aggregator
for residential electric customers, which include master–metered multiple occupancy
residences and small commercial electric customers, as defined in § 7–510.3 of this article,
that:
(1) are located within the county, including customers located within
municipal corporations located in the county;
(2) have not:

HOUSE BILL 1442 3
(i) selected an electricity supplier other than the standard offer
service supplier; or
(ii) refused to participate in the aggregation activities of the county;
and
(3) are not located in the service territory of:
(i) a municipal electric utility; [or]
(ii) [an electric cooperative] A MEMBER–REGULATED
COOPERATIVE AS DEFINED IN § 5–601 OF THE CORPORATIONS AND ASSOCIATIONS
ARTICLE; OR
(III) A SMALL RURAL ELECTRIC COOPERATIVE.
(h) “County” means a county of the State or Baltimore City.
(hh) “Small rural electric cooperative” means an electric company that:
(1) serves only the consumers that exclusively own and control the
company;
(2) conducts its business on a nonprofit basis; and
(3) supplies electricity to less than 1,000 electric meters in the State.
7–507.
(a) A person, other than an electric company providing standard offer service
under § 7–510(c) of this subtitle, a municipal electric utility serving customers solely in its
distribution territory, the Department of General Services selling energy under § 7–704.4
of this title, or a community choice aggregator under § 7–510.3 of this subtitle, may not
engage in the business of an electricity supplier in the State unless the person holds a
license issued by the Commission.
7–510.
(i) Except as provided in § 7–510.3 of this subtitle, a county or municipal
corporation may not act as an aggregator unless the Commission determines there is not
sufficient competition within the boundaries of the county or municipal corporation.
7–510.3.

HOUSE BILL 1442
(a) In this section, “small commercial electric customer” means a commercial
electric customer that has a peak electric load of not more than 25 kilowatts and includes
master–metered multiple occupancy residences that have a peak electric load of not more
than 25 kilowatts.
(b) [This section applies only in Montgomery County.
(c)] (1) There is a Community Choice Aggregation Pilot Program.
(2) Beginning December 31, 2023, a county may form a community choice
aggregator under this section.
[(d)] (C) (1) At least 60 days before initiating the process to form a
community choice aggregator, a county shall:
(i) develop an aggregation plan;
(ii) give written notice of the aggregation plan to each residential
and small commercial electric customer in the county;
(iii) publish a fair summary of the aggregation plan in at least one
newspaper of general circulation in the county;
(iv) if the county maintains a website, publish the full text of the
aggregation plan on the website; and
(v) give, for the Commission’s approval, written notice of its
intention to initiate a process to form a community choice aggregator.
(2) The aggregation plan shall:
(i) detail the processes related to participating in the aggregation
activities of a community choice aggregator;
(ii) contain information on the operations, funding, and
organizational structure of the community choice aggregator;
(iii) provide details on:
1. the rate setting and costs to participants, including an
analysis of historical and forecasted trends in electricity prices and a purchasing plan
designed to save ratepayers money;
2. methods that the community choice aggregator must use
for entering into and terminating agreements with other entities;

HOUSE BILL 1442 5
3. the rights and responsibilities of participating electric
customers; and
4. the termination of the aggregation program, if any; and
(iv) provide for universal electricity access, reliability, and equitable
treatment of all residential and small commercial electric customers in the county.
[(e)] (D) (1) At least 60 days after developing an aggregation plan and giving
the notice required under subsection [(d)] (C) of this section, a county may initiate the
process of forming a community choice aggregator by filing with the Commission:
(i) a notice of intent to form a community choice aggregator;
(ii) a copy of the aggregation plan developed in accordance with
subsection [(d)] (C) of this section;
(iii) a draft local law forming a community choice aggregator; and
(iv) proposed terms of service, rates, and categories of charges, fees,
or any other costs to customers unrelated to the actual cost of the electricity supply.
(2) The notice of intent shall include the name of the county in the
community choice aggregator.
(3) A county is a community choice aggregator after:
(i) submitting the notice of intent and aggregation plan required
under this subsection;
(ii) the Commission has approved its aggregation plan and proposed
terms filed in accordance with paragraph (1)(iv) of this subsection; and
(iii) enacting a local law that provides that the county shall act as a
community choice aggregator.
[(f)] (E) (1) In accordance with a schedule established by the Commission
under subsection [(l)] (K) of this section, if a county enacts a local law to act as a community
choice aggregator, the county shall provide or cause its selected electricity supplier, if any,
to provide written notice of the formation of the community choice aggregator to all
residential and small commercial electric customers in the county.
(2) The notice required under this subsection shall include:
(i) the identity and Commission–issued license numbers of any
selected electricity supplier;

HOUSE BILL 1442
(ii) terms and conditions of service;
(iii) new rates, charges, and fees for service under the community
choice aggregator;
(iv) a comparison of the new rates and the rates under the current
standard offer service;
(v) information on how to access the standard offer service available
from an electric company; and
(vi) the total renewable component of the electricity to be supplied
through a community choice aggregator, including the specific sources of any renewable
energy compared to the requirements under current law, if any.
(3) In the notice required under this subsection, the county shall provide to
the residential and small commercial electric customers in the county the opportunity to
refuse to participate in the aggregation activities of the community choice aggregator:
(i) by return submission of the notice to the community choice
aggregator or the electric company indicating the customer’s decision to refuse to
participate in the aggregation activities of the community choice aggregator; or
(ii) by contracting for service with a retail electricity supplier or by
choosing standard offer service from an electric company.
(4) A county that enacts a local law to act as a community choice aggregator
under this section may not exclude from the ability to participate in the aggregation
activities of the community choice aggregator:
(i) any residential or small commercial electric customer in the
county; or
(ii) for the provision of electric service for facilities located within the
jurisdiction of the community choice aggregator, any governmental entity.
[(g)] (F) A residential or small commercial electric customer is deemed to have
given permission to the county to act on the customer’s behalf as a community choice
aggregator:
(1) when the county receives from the customer:
(i) a reply from the notice required under subsection [(f)] (E) of this
section by which the customer explicitly grants permission for the customer to receive
service with the community choice aggregator; or

HOUSE BILL 1442 7
(ii) an application to receive service with the community choice
aggregator;
(2) in the case of a customer receiving standard offer service, within 30
days after the notice required by subsection [(f)] (E) of this section is given if:
(i) the county has not received a returned notice by that date; or
(ii) after the creation of the community choice aggregator and receipt
of the notice, the customer has not contracted with a retail electricity supplier or contacted
an electric company to select standard offer services; or
(3) on applying for new electric service within the territory served by the
community choice aggregator, unless the customer has:
(i) contracted with a retail electricity supplier for service; or
(ii) contacted an electric company to select standard offer service.
[(h)] (G) Except for a contract that automatically renews, at the end of a contract
term with an electricity supplier a residential or small commercial electric customer in the
jurisdiction of a community choice aggregator shall be automatically enrolled as a
participant in the aggregation activities of the community choice aggregator unless the
customer:
(1) gives written notice to the county declining to participate in the
aggregation activities of the community choice aggregator; or
(2) contracts for service with a retail electricity supplier or contacts an
electric company to select standard offer service.
[(i)] (H) This section may not be construed to prevent a residential or small
commercial electric customer in the county from choosing at any time:
(1) to enter into a contract with an electricity supplier other than the
community choice aggregator; or
(2) the standard offer service offered by an electric company.
[(j)] (I) (1) A community choice aggregator may not assess any new fee, tax,
or other charge in the aggregation charges or rates that is not related to the cost of:
(i) providing electricity supply and electricity supply service,
including service from a generating station owned by the community choice aggregator;
(ii) promoting the use of renewable energy; and

HOUSE BILL 1442
(iii) providing and promoting energy efficiency programs promoted
under paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection.
(2) A community choice aggregator, in consultation with all
[investor–owned] electric companies whose service territories include all or part of the
county and the Department of Housing and Community Development, may promote energy
efficiency programs that are:
(i) offered by the [investor–owned] electric companies; or
(ii) filed by the [investor–owned] electric companies with the
Commission for its approval in accordance with Subtitle 2, Part II of this title.
(3) In addition to the authority granted under paragraph (2) of this
subsection, a community choice aggregator may provide and promote energy efficiency
programs that are supplemental to any programs that are promoted under paragraph (2)
of this subsection.
[(k)] (J) (1) Except for the purposes of meeting the requirements of the
renewable energy portfolio standard under Subtitle 7 of this title, a community choice
aggregator may not be considered to be an electricity supplier under § 7–507(a) of this
subtitle.
(2) (i) A community choice aggregator may own an electric generating
facility or an electric storage facility in accordance with this article if the facility is designed
to provide energy primarily for use by the participants of the community choice aggregator.
(ii) When a community choice aggregator builds or acquires an
electric generating facility or electric storage facility, the community choice aggregator
shall submit to the Commission a plan for the use or disposition of the facility if the
community choice aggregator is dissolved.
(3) (i) A community choice aggregator may contract for service from an
electric generating facility in accordance with this article if the amount of contracted
electricity supply from the facility is not greater than the amount estimated to be necessary
to meet the electrical demand of the participants of the community choice aggregator.
(ii) When a community choice aggregator contracts for service from
an electric generating facility for a period exceeding 2 years, the community choice
aggregator shall submit to the Commission a plan for the transfer of the contract to another
electricity supplier if:
1. the community choice aggregator is dissolved; or
2. the pilot program ends without an extension or the
creation of a permanent community choice aggregator.

HOUSE BILL 1442 9
(4) Any contract relating to the provision of electric service by a community
choice aggregator, including any contract for the supply of electricity or the procurement or
financing of electric generation services shall allow for or anticipate the potential adoption
of an alternative resource adequacy mechanism that could apply in the State.
[(l)] (K) (1) Based on a determination of the mitigation of volumetric risk,
the Commission may establish by order or regulation a schedule that may not exceed a
period of 2 years, by which a community choice aggregator may transfer load from standard
offer service to retail or wholesale contracts under an aggregation plan.
(2) The Commission shall consider the impacts to the price and stability of
the procurement of standard offer service when considering a schedule under paragraph
(1) of this subsection.
[(m)] (L) (1) A county that is forming a community choice aggregator is
deemed to have obtained electric customer authorization to retrieve preenrollment usage
data for residential and small commercial electric customers in the county.
(2) In accordance with procedures established by the Commission, an
electric company shall provide to a community choice aggregator any relevant data for
customers in the jurisdiction of the community choice aggregator, including:
(i) preenrollment usage data; and
(ii) any other appropriate billing and electrical load data.
(3) An electric company shall provide to a county that is forming a
community choice aggregator data under this subsection as follows:
(i) only aggregate data when the county initiates the process of
forming a community choice aggregator; and
(ii) any customer–specific data after the aggregation plan is
approved by the Commission.
[(n)] (M) The Commission shall review applicable fees, request formats, and the
format of data provided to facilitate the intent of this section.
[(o)] (N) The Commission shall establish procedures for an electric customer
that is receiving electricity supply through a community choice aggregator to receive any
bill assistance credit or arrearage assistance to which the customer may be entitled under
§ 7–512.1 of this subtitle or any other federal or State bill and arrearage assistance
administered by the Office of Home Energy Programs.
[(p)] (O) The Commission may allocate the portion of delinquent accounts
receivable that is attributable to electricity supply between the electric customers
participating in the aggregation activities of a community choice aggregator and the electric

HOUSE BILL 1442
customers throughout the electric company’s service territory if the Commission
determines that:
(1) the amount of delinquent accounts receivable attributable to electric
customers receiving standard offer service is projected to increase to an extent that will
materially adversely impact the cost of providing standard offer service; and
(2) the projected increase in the amount of delinquent accounts receivable
attributable to electric customers receiving standard offer service is directly or indirectly
caused by the migration of a substantial number of electric customers from standard offer
service to participation in the aggregation activities of a community choice aggregator.
[(q)] (P) Bills sent to electric customers that participate in the aggregation
activities of a community choice aggregator shall identify the community choice aggregator
as the electricity supplier.
[(r)] (Q) (1) In this subsection, “Workgroup” means the Community Choice
Energy Workgroup established in accordance with this subsection.
(2) On or before September 1, 2021, the Commission shall establish a
Community Choice Energy Workgroup.
(3) The Workgroup shall consist of at least the following members:
(i) one representative [of the Montgomery County government]
FROM EACH COUNTY GOVERNMENT THAT HAS GIVEN THE COMMISSION WRITTEN
NOTICE OF ITS INTENTION TO INITIATE A PROCESS TO FORM A COMMUNITY CHOICE
AGGREGATOR UNDER SUBSECTION (C)(1)(V) OF THIS SECTION;
(ii) one representative of the Office of People’s Counsel;
(iii) one representative of each [investor–owned] electric company
whose service territory includes all or part of a county that participates in the pilot
program;
(iv) one representative of any competitive electricity supplier;
(v) one representative of residential and small commercial electric
customers;
(vi) one representative of low–income communities;
(vii) one representative of minority residential communities;
(viii) one representative with expertise in implementing community
choice aggregation programs; and

HOUSE BILL 1442 11
(ix) any other individuals identified by the Commission.
(4) The Commission shall provide staff for the Workgroup.
(5) Nothing in this subsection may be construed to limit the authority of
the Commission to take any action, including the adoption of regulations, without a
recommendation from the Workgroup.
(6) (i) During any year that a community choice aggregator operates in
the State, the Workgroup shall submit an annual report on the status of the community
choice aggregator to the Commission.
(ii) The Workgroup shall include in the annual report information
regarding:
1. rates, charges, and fees for service under each community
choice aggregator;
2. renewable energy;
3. customer satisfaction;
4. enrollment; and
5. any other information or metric determined by the
Workgroup or requested by the Commission.
[(s)] (R) (1) The Commission shall by regulation establish standards and
procedures to protect the consumer rights of residential customers within the territory of a
community choice aggregator that receive electricity supply through the community choice
aggregator.
(2) The regulations shall prohibit discrimination against a customer on the
basis of the location of the customer.
(3) The Commission shall seek the advice and recommendation of the
Community Choice Energy Workgroup established under subsection [(r)] (Q) of this section
when carrying out the provisions of this section and adopting regulations.
[(t)] (S) (1) The pilot program shall:
(i) begin on the earlier of:
1. the date that a county gives notice to the Commission of
its intention to initiate a process to form a community choice aggregator, in accordance with
subsection [(d)(1)(v)] (C)(1)(V) of this section; or

HOUSE BILL 1442
2. April 1, 2024; and
(ii) end 7 years after the beginning date, but not sooner than April
1, 2031.
(2) On or before April 1 of the sixth year after the beginning of the pilot
program, the Commission shall, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, report to the General Assembly on the status and effectiveness of the pilot program.
[(u)] (T) (1) At the conclusion of the pilot program described in this section,
the Commission shall study:
(i) the overall costs and benefits of the pilot program;
(ii) whether there were any incremental costs borne by standard
offer service customers resulting from the migration of customers between the community
choice aggregator and standard offer service; and
(iii) what mechanisms could be implemented to hold standard offer
service customers harmless from any incremental costs borne by standard offer service
customers identified under item (ii) of this paragraph.
(2) The Commission shall seek the advice and recommendation of the
Community Choice Energy Workgroup in the study required under this subsection.
(3) On or before December 31, 2031, the Commission shall report the
findings of the study to the Governor and the General Assembly, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article.
[(v)] (U) On or before December 31, 2023, the Commission shall adopt
regulations to implement this section, including regulations for:
(1) consumer protection;
(2) procedures to consider and review the analysis of historical and
forecasted trends in electricity prices and a purchasing plan designed to save ratepayers
money, submitted by county;
(3) a tariff structure for community choice aggregation noncommodity fees
and charges;
(4) a protocol for data exchange between community choice aggregators,
retail suppliers, and electric companies, including prohibitions on the community choice
aggregator from sharing, disclosing, or otherwise making accessible to a third party a
customer’s personal information;

HOUSE BILL 1442 13
(5) procedures by which a community choice aggregator may transfer load
from standard offer service to retail or wholesale contracts under an aggregation plan;
(6) the method by which the cost of delinquent accounts of a community
choice aggregator may be recovered from customers;
(7) procedures for enrolling a customer for service with a community choice
aggregator on expiration of the customer’s retail supply contract;
(8) procedures to protect a customer’s privacy and confidential data
collected or held by a community choice aggregator;
(9) procedures to mitigate any risk to standard offer service customers
caused by the potential for customers to migrate from a community choice aggregator to
standard offer service;
(10) procedures by which a community choice aggregator may be dissolved,
including procedures for the transfer of customers to standard offer service and the resale
of contracted electricity supply;
(11) the approval of a tariff structure for community choice [aggregrator]
AGGREGATOR interactions with electric companies, including:
(i) billing and payment collection;
(ii) dispute resolution;
(iii) financial settlement;
(iv) losses;
(v) metering services;
(vi) PJM Interconnection requirements;
(vii) scheduling; and
(viii) utility charges; and
(12) procedures to require that:
(i) a community choice aggregator that transfers all customers back
to standard offer service is considered to be dissolved; and
(ii) if a community choice aggregator is considered to be dissolved, it
may not be reformed except through the process of forming a new community choice
aggregator in accordance with this section.

HOUSE BILL 1442
[(w)] (V) [The Montgomery County government] A COUNTY THAT FORMS A
COMMUNITY CHOICE AGGREGATOR UNDER THIS SECTION shall:
(1) be solely responsible for the costs associated with any stranded costs
for:
(i) contracts entered into by the community choice aggregator for
electric supply; or
(ii) generation owned by a community choice aggregator; and
(2) pay for any costs the [Montgomery County] COUNTY government is
responsible for under item (1) of this subsection.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.